Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska74-1312
Department; establish priority list for railroad crossing safety improvement.

The department shall establish and update, as needed, a priority list for improving the safety of railroad crossings in Nebraska. The list shall identify all crossings in need of safety improvements and the relative order of need.

Laws 1979, LB 42, § 3.